District of Columbia statutes.
42-507

Estate in possession.

An estate in possession exists when the owner has an immediate right to the possession of the land.

Mar. 3, 1901, 31 Stat. 1351, ch. 854, § 1017

History

1981 Ed., § 45-207.
1973 Ed., § 45-807.

Prior Codifications